Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. State Use Tax
§ 39-16-104.
Taxation rate.

Except as otherwise provided, there is levied and shall be paid by the purchaser an excise tax at the same rate applied under W.S. 39-15-104(a) upon sales in Wyoming.

Effective July 1, 1993, in addition to the use tax under subsection (a) of this section, there is imposed an additional use tax of one percent (1%) which shall be administered as if the use tax rates under subsection (a) of this section were increased from three percent (3%) to four percent (4%). The revenue from these increases shall be distributed in the same manner as other use tax revenue under that subsection.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 26, § 1.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 140, § 2.

The tax rate imposed upon a transaction subject to this chapter shall be sourced as follows:

The retail purchase, excluding lease or rental, of a product shall be sourced as follows:

When the product is received by the purchaser at a business location of the seller, the purchase shall be sourced to that business location;

When the product is not received by the purchaser at a business location of the seller, the purchase shall be sourced to the location where receipt by the purchaser, or the purchaser’s agent designated as such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location indicated by instruction for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known to the seller;

When subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph do not apply, the purchase shall be sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser that is available from the business records of the seller that are maintained in the ordinary course of the seller’s business when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;

When subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph do not apply, the purchase shall be sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser obtained during the consummation of the purchase, including the address of a purchaser’s payment instrument, if no other address is available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;

When none of the previous rules of subparagraphs (A) through (D) of this paragraph apply, including the circumstance in which the seller is without sufficient information to apply any of the previous rules, then the location shall be determined by the address from which tangible personal property was shipped, from which the digital good or the computer software delivered electronically was first available for transmission by the seller, or from which the service was provided, disregarding for these purposes any location that merely provided the digital transfer of the product purchased;

For the purposes of this paragraph the terms “receive” and “receipt” mean taking possession of tangible personal property, making first use of services or taking possession or making first use of digital goods, whichever comes first. The terms “receive” and “receipt” do not include possession by a shipping company on behalf of the purchaser.

The lease or rental of tangible personal property, other than property identified in paragraph (iii) or (iv) of this subsection, shall be sourced as follows:

For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic payments, the first periodic payment shall be sourced the same as a retail purchase in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (i) of this subsection. Periodic payments made subsequently to the first payment shall be sourced to the primary property location for each period covered by the payment. The primary property location shall be as indicated by an address for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith. The property location shall not be altered by intermittent use at different locations, such as use of the business property that accompanies employees on business trips and service calls;

For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic payments, the payment shall be sourced the same as a retail purchase in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (i) of this subsection;

This paragraph shall not affect the imposition or computation of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.

The lease or rental of a motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer or aircraft that does not qualify as transportation equipment, as defined in paragraph (iv) of this subsection shall be sourced as follows:

For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic payment, each periodic payment shall be sourced to the primary property location. The primary property location shall be as indicated by an address for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith. This location shall not be altered by intermittent use at different locations;

For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic payments, the payment shall be sourced the same as a retail purchase in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (i) of this subsection;

This paragraph shall not affect the imposition or computation of sales or use tax on a lease or rental based on a lump sum or accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.

The retail purchase, including lease or rental of transportation equipment shall be sourced the same as a retail purchase in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (i) of this subsection. As used in this paragraph, “transportation equipment” means any of the following:

Locomotives and railcars that are utilized for the carriage of persons or property in interstate commerce;

Trucks and truck-tractors with a gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) of greater than ten thousand (10,000) pounds, trailers, semi-trailers or passenger buses that are:

Registered through the international registration plan; and

Operated under authority of a carrier authorized and certified by the United States department of transportation or another federal or a foreign authority to engage in the carriage of personnel or property in interstate or foreign commerce.

Aircraft that are operated by an air carrier authorized and certified by the United States department of transportation or another federal authority or a foreign authority to engage in the carriage of persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce;

Containers designed for use on and component parts attached or secured on the items set forth in subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph.

Except for the defined telecommunication services in paragraph (vii) of this subsection, the purchase of telecommunication service sold on a call-by-call basis shall be sourced to:

Each level of taxing jurisdiction where the call originates and terminates in that jurisdiction; or

Each level of taxing jurisdiction where the call either originates or terminates and in which the service address is also located.

Except for the defined telecommunication services in paragraph (vii) of this subsection, a purchase of telecommunication service sold on a basis other than a call-by-call basis and any ancillary service incidental to the sale, shall be sourced to the customer’s place of primary use;

The purchase of the following telecommunication services shall be sourced to each level of taxing jurisdiction as follows:

A purchase of mobile telecommunications services other than air-to-ground radio telephone service and prepaid calling service, shall be sourced to the customer’s place of primary use as required by the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, P.L. 106-252;

A purchase of post-paid calling service shall be sourced to the origination point of the telecommunications signal as first identified by either:

The seller’s telecommunications system; or

Information received by the seller from its service provider, where the system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller.

A purchase of prepaid calling service and prepaid wireless calling service shall be sourced in accordance with paragraph (i) of this subsection. Provided however, in the case of a purchase of a prepaid wireless calling service, the rule provided in subparagraph (i)(E) of this subsection shall include as an option the location associated with the mobile telephone number;

A purchase of a private communication service shall be sourced as follows:

Service for a separate charge related to a customer channel termination point shall be sourced to each level of jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination point is located;

Service where all customer termination points are located entirely within one (1) jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction shall be sourced in the jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points are located;

Service for segments of a channel between two (2) customer channel termination points located in different jurisdictions and which segments of a channel are separately charged shall be sourced fifty percent (50%) in each level of jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points are located;

Service for segments of a channel located in more than one (1) jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction and which segments are not separately billed shall be sourced in each jurisdiction based on the percentage determined by dividing the number of customer channel termination points in the jurisdiction by the total number of customer channel termination points.

The definitions in W.S. 39-15-104(f)(xi)(E) shall apply to paragraphs (v) through (viii) of this subsection.

Any vendor or certified service provider relying on an incorrect rate, boundary or jurisdictional information provided by the department in its tax rate database required under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement shall not be held liable for any under collection of tax caused by the department’s error.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2000, ch. 26, § 1; 2001, ch. 147, § 2; 2005, ch. 5, § 2; 2006, ch. 10, § 1; 2007, ch. 140, § 2; 2008, ch. 34, § 1; 2010, ch. 35, § 1; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Amendment effective January 1, 2008. —

Laws 2006, ch. 10, § 1, amends this section effective January 1, 2008, by rewriting (e), adding (i) through (vii).

The 2005 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2005, ch. 5, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2005.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former (d), which read: “The tax imposed under subsection (b) of this section shall be indexed in accordance with the formula in this subsection. The tax shall be reduced to one-half of one percent (.5%) effective July 1 if, not later than March 31 of the same year, it is determined that the unappropriated general fund balance at the end of the current budget period minus any expected shortfall in revenue to fully fund the school foundation program for the following school year will exceed thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000.00). The governor shall make this determination using actual revenues received during the current fiscal year, revenue estimates of the consensus revenue estimating group (CREG), actual appropriations and expenditure estimates for the foundation program determined by the department of education. If the determination made by the governor under this formula results in a reduction of the tax, the governor shall so certify to the department of revenue which shall order the rate reduced to one-half of one percent (.5%).”

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “When subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph do not apply” for “If it is undeterminable by the seller whether the product was received by the purchaser at a business location of the seller” in (e)(i)(C), and inserted “or a foreign authority” following “federal authority” in (e)(iv)(C).

Laws 2008, ch. 34, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

in (e)(vi), inserted “and any ancillary service incidental to the sale”; in (e)(vii)(C), inserted “and prepaid wireless calling service,” and substituted “a prepaid wireless calling service” for “mobile telecommunications service that is a prepaid telecommunications service.”

Laws 2010, ch. 35 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2010.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “W.S.

39-15-104

(a)” for “W.S.

39-15-104

.”

Editor's notes. —

The “Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act”, referred to
in (e)(vii)(A) of this section, appears generally as 4 USCS §§ 116-126.

Meaning of “this chapter.” —

The term “this chapter” referred to in the introductory paragraph means chapter 16 of title 39, §§

39-16-101

through

39-16-311

.